New Jersey, session 221, A4960.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 66 DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 19 Central Planning, Direction and Management 1000 Office of the Attorney General DIRECT STATE SERVICES 99-1000  Office of the Attorney General ................................ $75,000 Total Direct State Services Appropriation, Human Trafficking Survivors Assistance Fund . $75,000 Direct State Services: 99   Special Purpose, Human Trafficking Survivors Assistance Fund......................................................... ($75,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.